Hawaii statutes.
[Chapter 554G]

PERMITTED
TRANSFERS IN TRUST

Section

554G-1 Short title

554G-2 Definitions

554G-3 Repealed

554G-4 Permitted trustees

554G-4.5 Advisors

554G-5 Trust instrument

554G-6 Investments

554G-7 Retained interests of transferor

554G-8 Avoidance of permitted transfers in trust

554G-9 Limitations on permitted transfers

554G-10 Effect of avoidance of permitted
transfers

554G-11 Multiple transfers

554G-12 Repealed

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next